Illinois, session 104th, SB328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 2-209 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/2-209)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-209)7    Sec. 2-209. Act submitting to jurisdiction - Process. 8    (a) Any person, whether or not a citizen or resident of 9this State, who in person or through an agent does any of the 10acts hereinafter enumerated, thereby submits such person, and, 11if an individual, his or her personal representative, to the 12jurisdiction of the courts of this State as to any cause of 13action arising from the doing of any of such acts:14        (1) The transaction of any business within this State;15        (2) The commission of a tortious act within this 16    State;17        (3) The ownership, use, or possession of any real 18    estate situated in this State;19        (4) Contracting to insure any person, property or risk 20    located within this State at the time of contracting;21        (5) With respect to actions of dissolution of 22    marriage, declaration of invalidity of marriage and legal 23    separation, the maintenance in this State of a matrimonial   SB0328 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1    domicile at the time this cause of action arose or the 2    commission in this State of any act giving rise to the 3    cause of action;4        (6) With respect to actions brought under the Illinois 5    Parentage Act of 1984, as now or hereafter amended, or 6    under the Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 on and after the 7    effective date of that Act, the performance of an act of 8    sexual intercourse within this State during the possible 9    period of conception;10        (7) The making or performance of any contract or 11    promise substantially connected with this State;12        (8) The performance of sexual intercourse within this 13    State which is claimed to have resulted in the conception 14    of a child who resides in this State;15        (9) The failure to support a child, spouse or former 16    spouse who has continued to reside in this State since the 17    person either formerly resided with them in this State or 18    directed them to reside in this State;19        (10) The acquisition of ownership, possession or 20    control of any asset or thing of value present within this 21    State when ownership, possession or control was acquired;22        (11) The breach of any fiduciary duty within this 23    State;24        (12) The performance of duties as a director or 25    officer of a corporation organized under the laws of this 26    State or having its principal place of business within   SB0328 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1    this State;2        (13) The ownership of an interest in any trust 3    administered within this State; or4        (14) The exercise of powers granted under the 5    authority of this State as a fiduciary.6    (b) A court may exercise general jurisdiction in any 7action arising within or without this State against any person 8who:9        (1) Is a natural person present within this State when 10    served;11        (2) Is a natural person domiciled or resident within 12    this State when the cause of action arose, the action was 13    commenced, or process was served;14        (3) Is a corporation organized under the laws of this 15    State or having its principal place of business in this 16    State; or17        (4) Is a natural person or corporation doing business 18    within this State; or19        (5) Is a foreign business corporation that has 20    consented to general jurisdiction in this State in 21    accordance with subsection (b) of Section 13.20 or 22    subsection (c-5) of Section 13.70 of the Business 23    Corporation Act of 1983, but only if (i) the action 24    alleges injury or illness resulting from exposure to a 25    substance defined as toxic under the Uniform Hazardous 26    Substances Act of Illinois, whether the cause of action   SB0328 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1    arises within or without this State, and (ii) jurisdiction 2    is proper as to one or more named co-defendants under 3    subsection (a) of this Section.4    (b-5) Foreign defamation judgment. The courts of this 5State shall have personal jurisdiction over any person who 6obtains a judgment in a defamation proceeding outside the 7United States against any person who is a resident of Illinois 8or, if not a natural person, has its principal place of 9business in Illinois, for the purposes of rendering 10declaratory relief with respect to that resident's liability 11for the judgment, or for the purpose of determining whether 12said judgment should be deemed non-recognizable pursuant to 13this Code, to the fullest extent permitted by the United 14States Constitution, provided:15        (1) the publication at issue was published in 16    Illinois, and17        (2) that resident (i) has assets in Illinois which 18    might be used to satisfy the foreign defamation judgment, 19    or (ii) may have to take actions in Illinois to comply with 20    the foreign defamation judgment.21    The provisions of this subsection (b-5) shall apply to 22persons who obtained judgments in defamation proceedings 23outside the United States prior to, on, or after the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. 25    (c) A court may also exercise jurisdiction on any other 26basis now or hereafter permitted by the Illinois Constitution   SB0328 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1and the Constitution of the United States.2    (d) Service of process upon any person who is subject to 3the jurisdiction of the courts of this State, as provided in 4this Section, may be made by personally serving the summons 5upon the defendant outside this State, as provided in this 6Act, with the same force and effect as though summons had been 7personally served within this State.8    (e) Service of process upon any person who resides or 9whose business address is outside the United States and who is 10subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State, as 11provided in this Section, in any action based upon product 12liability may be made by serving a copy of the summons with a 13copy of the complaint attached upon the Secretary of State. 14The summons shall be accompanied by a $5 fee payable to the 15Secretary of State. The plaintiff shall forthwith mail a copy 16of the summons, upon which the date of service upon the 17Secretary is clearly shown, together with a copy of the 18complaint to the defendant at his or her last known place of 19residence or business address. Plaintiff shall file with the 20circuit clerk an affidavit of the plaintiff or his or her 21attorney stating the last known place of residence or the last 22known business address of the defendant and a certificate of 23mailing a copy of the summons and complaint to the defendant at 24such address as required by this subsection (e). The 25certificate of mailing shall be prima facie evidence that the 26plaintiff or his or her attorney mailed a copy of the summons   SB0328 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1and complaint to the defendant as required. Service of the 2summons shall be deemed to have been made upon the defendant on 3the date it is served upon the Secretary and shall have the 4same force and effect as though summons had been personally 5served upon the defendant within this State.6    (f) Only causes of action arising from acts enumerated 7herein may be asserted against a defendant in an action in 8which jurisdiction over him or her is based upon subsection 9(a).10    (g) Nothing herein contained limits or affects the right 11to serve any process in any other manner now or hereafter 12provided by law.13(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 14    Section 10. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is 15amended by changing Sections 13.20 and 13.70 as follows: 16    (805 ILCS 5/13.20)  (from Ch. 32, par. 13.20)17    Sec. 13.20. Effect of authority. 18    (a) Upon the filing of the application for authority by 19the Secretary of State, the corporation shall have the right 20to transact business in this State for those purposes set 21forth in its application, subject, however, to the right of 22this State to revoke such right to transact business in this 23State as provided in this Act.24    (b) A corporation that obtains or continues to maintain   SB0328 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1the right to transact business in this State consents to the 2exercise of general jurisdiction by the courts of this State 3in accordance with paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of Section 42-209 of the Code of Civil Procedure.5    A corporation consents to general jurisdiction in 6accordance with paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of Section 72-209 of the Code of Civil Procedure upon registering to do 8business in this State at any time following the effective 9date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 10    A corporation that has previously registered to do 11business in this State consents to general jurisdiction in 12accordance with paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of Section 132-209 of the Code of Civil Procedure upon the next date after 14the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 15Assembly on which the filing of its annual report in 16accordance of Section 14.05 is due, regardless of whether or 17not it then files its annual report. 18    Consent to such general jurisdiction terminates upon, and 19only upon, formal withdrawal from this State. 20(Source: P.A. 92-33, eff. 7-1-01.) 21    (805 ILCS 5/13.70)  (from Ch. 32, par. 13.70)22    Sec. 13.70. Transacting business without authority. 23    (a) No foreign corporation transacting business in this 24State without authority to do so is permitted to maintain a 25civil action in any court of this State, until the corporation   SB0328 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1obtains that authority. Nor shall a civil action be maintained 2in any court of this State by any successor or assignee of the 3corporation on any right, claim or demand arising out of the 4transaction of business by the corporation in this State, 5until authority to transact business in this State is obtained 6by the corporation or by a corporation that has acquired all or 7substantially all of its assets.8    (b) The failure of a foreign corporation to obtain 9authority to transact business in this State does not impair 10the validity of any contract or act of the corporation, and 11does not prevent the corporation from defending any action in 12any court of this State.13    (c) A foreign corporation that transacts business in this 14State without authority is liable to this State, for the years 15or parts thereof during which it transacted business in this 16State without authority, in an amount equal to all fees, 17franchise taxes, penalties and other charges that would have 18been imposed by this Act upon the corporation had it duly 19applied for and received authority to transact business in 20this State as required by this Act, but failed to pay the 21franchise taxes that would have been computed thereon, and 22thereafter filed all reports required by this Act; and, if a 23corporation fails to file an application for authority within 2460 days after it commences business in this State, in addition 25thereto it is liable for a penalty of either 10% of the filing 26fee, license fee and franchise taxes or $200 plus $5.00 for   SB0328 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06446 JRC 16482 b1each month or fraction thereof in which it has continued to 2transact business in this State without authority therefor, 3whichever penalty is greater. The Attorney General shall bring 4proceedings to recover all amounts due this State under this 5Section.6    (c-5) A foreign corporation that transacts business in 7this State without authority is deemed to have consented to 8general jurisdiction in accordance with subsection (b) of 9Section 13.20 to the same extent as if it were registered to do 10business in this State. Consent to such general jurisdiction 11commences upon committing an act constituting the transaction 12of business in this State without authority at any time after 13the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 14Assembly and remains effective for 180 days following the 15committing of each and every such act. 16    (d) The Attorney General shall bring an action to restrain 17a foreign corporation from transacting business in this State, 18if the authority of the foreign corporation to transact 19business has been revoked under subsection (m) of Section 2013.50 of this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 95-515, eff. 8-28-07.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.